Utah statutes.
34-20-7.   Organization and collective bargaining -- Employees' rights.

Employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection; and such employees shall also have the right to refrain from any or all of such activities.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

